District of Columbia statutes.
8-2034

Civil infractions.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not more than $300 for each violation. A violation of this chapter shall be a civil infraction for purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-181, § 5, 35 DCR 7715

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 8-2204.
1981 Ed., § 6-1024.